Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 12 Health Care Data Collection

31-7-280.
Health care provider annual reports; form.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Health care provider” means any hospital or ambulatory surgical or obstetrical facility having a license or permit issued by the department under Article 1 of this chapter.

“Indigent person” means any person having as a maximum allowable income level an amount corresponding to 125 percent of the federal poverty guideline.

“Third-party payor” means any entity which provides health care insurance or a health care service plan, including but not limited to providers of major medical or comprehensive accident or health insurance, whether or not through a self-insurance plan, Medicaid, or health care plans, but does not mean a specified disease or supplemental hospital indemnity payor.

There shall be required from each health care provider in this state an annual report of certain health care information to be submitted to the department. The report shall be due on the last day of January and shall cover the 12 month period preceding each such calendar year.

The report required under subsection (b) of this Code section shall contain the following information:

Total gross revenues;

Bad debts;

Amounts of free care extended, excluding bad debts;

Amounts of contractual adjustments;

Amounts of care provided under a Hill-Burton commitment;

Amounts of charity care provided to indigent persons;

Amounts of outside sources of funding from governmental entities, philanthropic groups, or any other sources, including the proportion of any such funding dedicated to the care of indigent persons;

For cases involving indigent persons:

The number of persons treated;

The number of inpatients and outpatients;

Total patient days;

The total number of patients categorized by county of residence;

The indigent care costs incurred by the health care provider by county of residence;

The public, profit, or nonprofit status of the health care provider and whether or not the provider is a teaching hospital;

The number of board certified physicians, by specialty, on the staff of the health care provider;

The number of nursing hours per day for each hospital and per patient visit for each ambulatory surgical or obstetrical facility;

For ambulatory surgical or obstetrical facilities, the types of surgery performed and emergency back-up systems available for that surgery;

For hospitals:

The availability of emergency services, trauma centers, intensive care units, and neonatal intensive care units;

Procedures hospitals specialize in and the number of such procedures performed annually; and

Cesarean section rates by number and as a percentage of deliveries; and

Data available on a recognized uniform billing statement or substantially similar form generally used by health care providers which reflect, but are not limited to, the following type of data obtained during a 12 month period during each reporting period: unique longitudinal nonidentifying patient code, the patient’s birth date, sex, race, geopolitical subdivision code, ZIP Code, county of residence, type of bill, beginning and ending service dates, date of admission, discharge date, disposition of the patient, medical or health record number, principal and secondary diagnoses, principal and secondary procedures and procedure dates, external cause of injury codes, diagnostic related group number (DRG), DRG procedure coding used, revenue codes, total charges and summary of charges by revenue code, payor or plan identification, or both, place of service code such as the uniform hospital identification number and hospital name, attending physician and other ordering, referring, or performing physician identification number, and specialty code.

The department shall provide a form for the report required by subsection (b) of this Code section and may provide in such form for further categorical divisions of the information listed in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The department shall, within a period of one year following July 1, 1989, in cooperation with representatives of such consumer groups and associations and health care providers as it shall designate, study and determine such quality indicators and such additional or alternative information related to the intent and purpose of this article as the department shall determine are in the best interests of the residents of this state.

In the event that the department does not receive from a health care provider an annual report containing the data and information required by this article within 30 days following the date such report was due or receives a timely but incomplete report, the department shall notify the health care provider regarding the deficiencies, by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested. In the event such deficiency continues for 15 days after said notification has been given, the health care provider shall be liable for a penalty in the amount of $1,000.00 for such violation and an additional penalty of $500.00 for each day during which such violation continues and be subject to appropriate sanctions otherwise authorized by law, including, but not limited to, suspension or revocation of that provider’s permit or license.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-280

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 991, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1995, p. 745, § 2.1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1201, § 2.1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 31/SB 465; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-21/SB 433; Ga. L. 2017, p. 164, § 55/HB 127.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “or health care plans,” for “hospital service nonprofit corporation plans, health care plans, or nonprofit medical service corporation plans,” in the middle of paragraph (a)(4).

31-7-281.
Data system established; departmental authority.

The department shall be required to establish and operate a state-wide health care data system to collect, compile, analyze, and disseminate data collected pursuant to this article from health care providers and other specified entities.

The department shall be authorized to execute contracts or establish written agreements for the purpose of avoiding duplication of data collected pursuant to this article.

Where an existing data collection system meets the collection requirements of the department pursuant to this article, the department shall utilize such existing system when the significant elements of such data are collected, provided that such system meets the requirements of the department pursuant to this article and is available, without undue restrictions, to the department. For purposes of this subsection, reimbursement from the department for the costs incurred by such existing system in collecting this data shall not be considered an undue restriction.

The department shall have complete authority over any data collection functions performed pursuant to this article and shall be authorized to perform such data analyses as shall, in its discretion, be required.

The department shall establish a system to review and audit selected report data which contain the information listed in subsection (c) of Code Section 31-7-280 and which are collected other than by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-281

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 991, § 1.

31-7-282.
Collection and submission of data.

The department shall be authorized to request, collect, or receive the collection and submission of data listed in subsection (c) of Code Section 31-7-280 from:

Health care providers;

The Department of Human Services;

The Commissioner of Insurance;

Reserved;

Third-party payors;

A nationally recognized health care accreditation body; and

Other appropriate sources as determined by the department.

Any entity specified in paragraphs (1) through (3) of this Code section which has in its custody or control data requested by the department pursuant to this Code section shall provide the department with such data, but any data regarding a health care provider which is already available in the records of any state officer, department, or agency specified in paragraph (2) or (3) of this Code section shall not be required to be provided to the department by that health care provider.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-282

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 991, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, §§ 22, 24; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 31; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 31/SB 465; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-22/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 337, § 5/SB 361.

31-7-283.
Compilation and dissemination of information; rules and regulations.

The department shall compile, direct the compilation of, and disseminate comparative information provided in the annual reports under Code Section 31-7-280 on a health care provider specific basis.

Any data collected by the department may be included in department reports pursuant to this article as deemed appropriate to offer full information to the public. Prior to any release or dissemination of the data, the department shall permit the reporting entity a 30 day opportunity to verify the accuracy of any information pertaining to its data. The reporting entity may submit to the department any corrections of errors in the compilations of the data with any supporting evidence and comments. The department shall correct for the report such data which, in its judgment, are found to be in error. Any information, evidence, or comments submitted to the department in writing by the reporting entity shall be included as a part of the department’s release or dissemination.

If the data required by the department are available from the reporting entity by acceptably formatted, computer readable means, such method for reporting shall be preferred.

The reporting of any data required by this article by specified types of health care providers shall include health care providers operated by state, county, municipality, public or private entities, or any combination thereof.

The department shall be authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate and carry out its authority and duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-283

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 991, § 1.

31-7-284.
Public disclosure; updating of data base; publication; fees.

Subject to the procedures specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-283, the department shall be authorized to disclose nonpatient-specific data required under this article. Dissemination of such data to the public shall be made in clear and understandable language and in such form as to facilitate appropriate planning and choices on the part of consumers, providers, and payors.

The department data base established pursuant to this article shall be updated no less frequently than on an annual basis. Public reports from that data shall be published no less frequently than annually.

The costs to the state associated with the data collection system provided for in this article shall be paid through the department budget. The department shall, at its discretion and funds permitting, begin collection and dissemination of data immediately. The department is authorized to charge fees for reports, data, and information related to the data system; provided, however, no fees shall be imposed upon health care providers which submit data to the department pursuant to this article. The department shall implement a fee scale for such information that will result in fee collections not to exceed the costs of the data collection system. All such fees shall be remitted to the general fund of the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-284

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 991, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “payors” was substituted for “payers” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

31-7-285.
Confidentiality; liability.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful for any entity which may be requested or required to provide data to the department under this article so to provide that information or for the department or its designees to provide such information as authorized or required by this article or any other law.

Information provided to the department pursuant to this article or information released by the department shall not identify a patient by name or specific address. Any person, firm, corporation, association, or other entity who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person shall not be civilly liable as a result of the person’s acts, omissions, or decisions as an officer or employee or agent in connection with the person’s duties for the department under this article.

Unless otherwise provided in this article, the data collected by and furnished to the department pursuant to this article shall not be public records under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 or any other law governing the maintenance, inspection, or dissemination of data collected by the state. The reports prepared for release or dissemination from the data collected shall be public records under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50. The confidentiality of patients shall be protected and no provision of this article shall affect any provision of law relating to patient confidentiality.

No cause of action shall arise against a person, entity, or health care provider for disclosing or reporting information in accordance with this article; provided, however, that this Code section shall not provide immunity for disclosing or furnishing false information with malice or willful intent to injure any person.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-285

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 991, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.